Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2885
Delegated dispensing permit; worker; qualifications.

No person shall act as a public health clinic worker in a public health clinic or as a dialysis drug or device distributor worker for a dialysis drug or device distributor unless the person:

(1) Is at least eighteen years of age;

(2) Has earned a high school diploma or the equivalent;

(3) Has completed approved training as provided in section 38-2886; and

(4) Has demonstrated proficiency as provided in section 38-2887.

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 24;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 77;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.54;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 981.